Utah statutes.
76-10-916.   Attorney General's powers -- Investigations -- Institution of actions -- Cooperation.

(1)  The attorney general may investigate suspected violations of this act and institute appropriate actions regarding those suspected violations as provided in this act.

(2)  Any violations of this act which come to the attention of any state government officer or agency shall be reported to the attorney general.  All state government officers and agencies shall cooperate with, and assist in, any prosecution for violation of this act.

(3)  The attorney general may proceed under any antitrust laws in the state or federal courts on behalf of this state, any of its political subdivisions or agencies, or as parens patriae on behalf of natural persons in this state.

